California, session 20252026, AB2465.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 17.6 (commencing with Section 7300) is added to Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 17.6. No Taxpayer Dollars For for Family Separation7300. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, in any year in which a business entity is directly invested in, owns, or manages a private detention facility or contracts with a private detention facility or agency engaging in immigration enforcement, that business entity shall be ineligible to receive any state-provided grant, loan, or tax credit as described in Section 17137 or 23637 of the Revenue and Taxation Code other than with respect to tax credits received by any direct or indirect partner or member of a nonprofit sponsored venture to which a taxpayer has made a direct or indirect loan or capital contribution or tax credits allowed under Section 12206, 17058, or 23610.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code directly or indirectly purchased from a nonprofit housing sponsor.(b) This chapter shall not apply to a provider of health care, as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, that contracts with a private detention facility or agency engaging in immigration enforcement for the purpose of providing health care services for injured or ill individuals detained by, or whose care is the financial responsibility of, an agency engaging in immigration enforcement. 7300.1. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Agency engaging in immigration enforcement” means any out-of-state agency or federal agency that engages in arresting, detaining, transporting, or deporting individuals pursuant to federal immigration law.(b) “Business entity” has the same definition as that term is defined in Section 82005. (c) “Immigration enforcement” has the same definition as that term is defined in Section 7284.4.(d) “Invests in” means an entity that owns at least 5 percent of a private detention facility or private detention facility operator.(e) “Manages” means an entity that the owner contracts with to control the daily operations of a private detention facility or private detention facility operator.(f) “Nonprofit housing sponsor” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 50091 of the Health and Safety Code.(g) “Nonprofit sponsored venture” means a limited partnership or a limited liability company where a nonprofit housing sponsor or an entity wholly owned by a nonprofit housing sponsor is designated as the managing general partner of the partnership or managing member of the limited liability company.(h) “Owns” means an entity that owns at least 5 percent of a private detention facility or private detention facility operator or that owns or leases the building or land on which a private detention facility operates.(i) “Private detention facility” and “private detention facility operator” have the same meanings as those terms are defined in Section 7320.7300.2. Any state agency that administers a program to provide or that otherwise provides a grant or loan shall screen applicants or otherwise eligible recipients of that grant or loan, to determine whether they are an ineligible entity as described in Section 7300.7300.3. (a) The Due Process for All Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.(b) Upon receiving an estimate described in subdivision (f) of Section 17137 or 23637 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the Controller shall transfer an amount equal to that estimate from the General Fund to the Due Process for All Fund.(c) Moneys in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for purposes of immigration-related services and programs within the state.(d) An appropriation of moneys from the fund shall not be used as justification for reducing, eliminating, or failing to increase other appropriations for immigration-related services and programs and shall not be used to supplant existing state funds for immigration-related services and programs.SEC. 2. Section 17137 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17137. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, in which a taxpayer is directly invested in, owns, or manages a private detention facility or contracts with a private detention facility or agency engaging in immigration enforcement, that taxpayer a disqualified taxpayer, they shall be ineligible to claim any credit allowed, and shall be ineligible to claim any carryover for any credit previously allowed, under this part for that taxable year. (2) This section shall not apply to any of the following:(A) Tax credits received by any direct or indirect partner or member of a nonprofit sponsored venture to which the taxpayer has made a direct or indirect loan or capital contribution.(B) Any low-income housing tax credit allowed pursuant to Section 12206, 17058, or 23610.5 and directly or indirectly purchased from that was originally issued to a nonprofit housing sponsor. sponsor or nonprofit sponsored venture.(C) The credits provided under Section 19002.(3)This section shall not apply to a provider of health care, as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, that contracts with a private detention facility or agency engaging in immigration enforcement for the purpose of providing health care services for injured or ill individuals detained by, or whose care is the financial responsibility of, an agency engaging in immigration enforcement.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Agency engaging in immigration enforcement” means any out-of-state agency or federal agency that engages in arresting, detaining, transporting, or deporting individuals pursuant to federal immigration law.(2) (A) “Covered services” means detention, transportation, custody, or deportation services and includes providing software, information technology, surveillance equipment and technology, data analytics, artificial intelligence, applications, trainings for officers engaging in immigration enforcement, weapons, and digital systems or platforms used and specifically contracted to support immigration enforcement.(B) “Covered services” does not include any service provided by a provider of health care, as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, under a contract with a private detention facility or agency engaging in immigration enforcement for the purpose of providing health care services for injured or ill individuals detained by, or whose care is the financial responsibility of, an agency engaging in immigration enforcement.(3) “Disqualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer that satisfies either of the following:(A) Is directly invested in, owns, or manages a private detention facility.(B) (i) Is, or is related to, a publicly traded company that contracts with a private detention facility or agency engaging in immigration enforcement to provide covered services and that has a market capitalization of at least one hundred fifty billion dollars ($150,000,000,000) on any day after September 30, 2026. A taxpayer that satisfies this subparagraph is a disqualified taxpayer only for taxable years beginning with the first taxable year in which they satisfy this subparagraph. (ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, a person is related to a publicly traded company if they are treated as related under Section 267, 318, or 707 of the Internal Revenue Code. (2)(4) “Immigration enforcement” has the same definition as that term is defined in Section 7284.4 of the Government Code.(3)(5) (A) “Invests in” means an entity that owns at least 5 percent of the ownership shares or interests of a private detention facility or private detention facility operator.(B) “Invests in” does not include holdings in a custodial, fiduciary, or similar capacity where the business entity does not have discretionary authority to select the issuer or direct the investment, including passive index-tracking strategies. (4)(6) “Manages” means an entity that the owner contracts with to control the daily operations of a private detention facility or private detention facility operator.(5)(7) “Nonprofit housing sponsor” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 50091 of the Health and Safety Code.(6)(8) “Nonprofit sponsored venture” means a limited partnership or a limited liability company where a nonprofit housing sponsor or an entity wholly owned by a nonprofit housing sponsor is designated as the managing general partner of the partnership or managing member of the limited liability company. (7)(9) (A) “Owns” means an entity that owns at least 5 percent of the ownership shares or interests of a private detention facility or private detention facility operator or that owns or leases the building or land on which a private detention facility operates.(B) “Owns” does not include ownership interests held solely on behalf of clients in a custodial, fiduciary, or similar capacity. (8)(10) “Private detention facility” and “private detention facility operator” have the same meanings as those terms are defined in Section 7320 of the Government Code.(c) The Franchise Tax Board shall require a taxpayer to declare whether they are an entity ineligible to claim credits pursuant to subdivision (a) for that taxable year in a form and manner prescribed by the board.(d) The carryover period for any credit carried over from a prior year that is not allowed to be claimed due to the application of this section shall be increased by one taxable year, only for the first taxable year during which they are not allowed to claim the credit by application of this section. Any credits not claimed within the allowed time shall be included in the estimate the Franchise Tax Board provides to the Controller in subdivision (f). (e) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, guideline, or any other guidance established or issued by the board pursuant to this section.(f) (1) On or before July 1, 2029, and on or before July 1 annually thereafter, the board shall estimate the amount of tax collected, attributable to taxpayers being made ineligible for tax credits by this section, for the taxable year that is two years prior and shall report that estimate to the Controller.(2) The disclosure provisions of this subdivision shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542.SEC. 3. Section 23637 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:23637. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, in which a taxpayer is directly invested in, owns, or manages a private detention facility or contracts with a private detention facility or agency engaging in immigration enforcement, that taxpayer shall be ineligible to claim any credit allowed, and a disqualified taxpayer, they shall be ineligible to claim any carryover for any credit previously allowed, under this part for that taxable year.(2) This section shall not apply to any of the following:(A) Tax credits received by any direct or indirect partner or member of a nonprofit sponsored venture to which the taxpayer has made a direct or indirect loan or capital contribution.(B) Any low-income housing tax credit allowed pursuant to Section 12206, 17058, or 23610.5 and directly or indirectly purchased from that was originally issued to a nonprofit housing sponsor. sponsor or a nonprofit sponsored venture.(C) The credit allowed for estimated tax paid under Section 19023.(3)This section shall not apply to a provider of health care, as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, that contracts with a private detention facility or agency engaging in immigration enforcement for the purpose of providing health care services for injured or ill individuals detained by, or whose care is the financial responsibility of, an agency engaging in immigration enforcement.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Agency engaging in immigration enforcement” means any out-of-state agency or federal agency that engages in arresting, detaining, transporting, or deporting individuals pursuant to federal immigration law.(2) (A) “Covered services” means detention, transportation, custody, or deportation services and includes providing software, information technology, surveillance equipment and technology, data analytics, artificial intelligence, applications, trainings for officers engaging in immigration enforcement, weapons, and digital systems or platforms used and specifically contracted to support immigration enforcement.(B) “Covered services” does not include any service provided by a provider of health care, as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, under a contract with a private detention facility or agency engaging in immigration enforcement for the purpose of providing health care services for injured or ill individuals detained by, or whose care is the financial responsibility of, an agency engaging in immigration enforcement.(3) “Disqualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer that satisfies either of the following:(A) Is directly invested in, owns, or manages a private detention facility.(B) (i) Is, or is related to, a publicly traded company that contracts with a private detention facility or agency engaging in immigration enforcement to provide covered services and that has a market capitalization of at least one hundred fifty billion dollars ($150,000,000,000) on any day after September 30, 2026. A taxpayer that satisfies this subparagraph is a disqualified taxpayer only for taxable years beginning with the first taxable year in which they satisfy this subparagraph.(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, a person is related to a publicly traded company if they are treated as related under Section 267, 318, or 707 of the Internal Revenue Code. (2)(4) “Immigration enforcement” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 7284.4 of the Government Code.(3)(5) (A) “Invests in” means an entity that owns at least 5 percent of the ownership shares or interests of a private detention facility or private detention facility operator.(B) “Invests in” does not include holdings in a custodial, fiduciary, or similar capacity where the business entity does not have discretionary authority to select the issuer or direct the investment, including passive index-tracking strategies. (4)(6) “Manages” means an entity that the owner contracts with to control the daily operations of a private detention facility or private detention facility operator.(5)(7) “Nonprofit housing sponsor” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 50091 of the Health and Safety Code.(6)(8) “Nonprofit sponsored venture” means a limited partnership or a limited liability company where a nonprofit housing sponsor or an entity wholly owned by a nonprofit housing sponsor is designated as the managing general partner of the partnership or managing member of the limited liability company. (7)(9) (A) “Owns” means an entity that owns at least 5 percent of the ownership shares or interests of a private detention facility or private detention facility operator or that owns or leases the building or land on which a private detention facility operates.(B) “Owns” does not include ownership interests held solely on behalf of clients in a custodial, fiduciary, or similar capacity. (8)(10) “Private detention facility” and “private detention facility operator” have the same meanings as those terms are defined in Section 7320 of the Government Code.(c) A taxpayer ineligible for a credit under this section in a taxable year shall not assign any credit to an eligible assignee pursuant to Section 23663. (c)(d) The Franchise Tax Board shall require a taxpayer to declare whether they are an entity ineligible for credits pursuant to subdivision (a) for that taxable year in a form and manner prescribed by the board.(d)(e) The carryover period for any credit carried over from a prior year that is not allowed to be claimed due to the application of this section shall be increased by one taxable year, only for the first taxable year during which they are not allowed to claim the credit by application of this section. Any credits not claimed within the allowed time shall be included in the estimate the Franchise Tax Board provides to the Controller in subdivision (f). (e)(f) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, guideline, or any other guidance established or issued by the board pursuant to this section.(f)(g) (1) On or before July 1, 2029, and on or before July 1 annually thereafter, the board shall estimate the amount of tax collected, attributable to taxpayers being made ineligible for tax credits by this section, for the taxable year that is two years prior and shall report that estimate to the Controller.(2) The disclosure provisions of this subdivision shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542.